Washington statutes.
RCW 41.45.067

Failure of state or employer to make required contribution—Resulting increase in contribution rate borne in full by state or employer—Members' contribution deducted each payroll period.

(1) Any increase in the contribution rate required as the result of a failure of the state or of an employer to make any contribution required by this section shall be borne in full by the state or by that employer not making the contribution.

(2) The director shall notify all employers of any pending adjustment in the required contribution rate and such pending adjustment in the required contribution rate and any increase shall be announced at least thirty days prior to the effective date of the change.

(3) Members' contributions required by RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.061 shall be deducted from the members' compensation each payroll period. The members' contribution and the employers' contribution shall be remitted directly to the department within fifteen days following the end of the calendar month during which the payroll period ends.

(4) The state's contribution required for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 shall be transferred to the appropriate fund from the total contributions transferred by the state treasurer under RCW 41.45.050.

[ 2001 2nd sp.s. c 11 s 14; 2000 c 247 s 507.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2001 2nd sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 41.45.010.

Effective dates—Subchapter headings not law—2000 c 247: See RCW 41.40.931 and 41.40.932.